Utah statutes.
75-5-302.   Venue.
The venue for guardianship proceedings for an incapacitated person is in the
place where the incapacitated person resides or is present. If the
incapacitated person is admitted to an institution pursuant to order of a
court of competent jurisdiction, venue is also in the county in which that
court sits.
